Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 15. Motorcycle Safety Education Program

§ 31-5-1501.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Department” means the Wyoming department of transportation;

“Director” means the director of the department of transportation;

“Program” means the Wyoming motorcycle safety education program established under W.S.

31-5-1502

;

“This act” means W.S.

31-5-1501

through

31-5-1507

.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 146, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-5-1502.
Motorcycle safety education program created.

The department shall develop standards for, establish and administer the Wyoming motorcycle safety education program.

The program shall provide for novice rider training courses in sufficient numbers and at locations throughout the state as necessary to meet the reasonably anticipated needs of state residents who desire to complete the course. The program shall also include instructor training courses and instructor approval.

The program may include rider training courses for experienced riders, activities to increase motorcyclists’ alcohol and drug effects awareness, motorcycle driver improvement efforts, motorcycle licensing improvement efforts, program promotion activities and other efforts to enhance motorcycle safety through education, including enhancement of public awareness of motorcycles.

The director shall appoint a program coordinator to oversee and direct the program.

Standards for the motorcycle rider training courses, including standards for course content, delivery, curriculum, materials, and student evaluation, and standards for the training and approval of instructors shall comply with the requirements of this act and shall meet or exceed established national standards for motorcycle rider training courses.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 146, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-1501(a)(iv).

§ 31-5-1503.
Rider training courses; certificates; exemption for licensing skills test.

The program shall offer motorcycle rider training courses designed to develop and instill the knowledge, attitudes, habits and skills necessary for the proper operation of a motorcycle. The courses shall be taught only by instructors approved under W.S.

31-5-1504

and shall include not less than eight (8) hours of hands-on instruction for a novice course.

Rider training courses shall be open to any resident of the state who either holds a current valid driver’s license for any classification or who is eligible for a motorcycle instruction permit.

The department shall issue certificates of completion in a manner and form prescribed by the director to persons who satisfactorily complete the requirements of a motorcycle rider training course offered or authorized by the state program.

The department may exempt applicants for a motorcycle driver’s license or endorsement from the licensing skill test if they present evidence of successful completion of an approved rider training course which includes a similar test of skill.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 146, § 1.

§ 31-5-1504.
Instructor training and approval.

The department shall approve instructors for the motorcycle rider training courses. No person shall be approved as an instructor unless the person meets the requirements of this act and regulations of the department and unless the person holds a currently valid instructor certification issued by the motorcycle safety foundation or another nationally recognized motorcycle safety instructor certifying body.

The program shall offer instructor training courses as needed to prepare instructors to teach the motorcycle rider training courses. Successful completion of the instructor training course shall require the participant to demonstrate knowledge of the course material, knowledge of proper motorcycle operation, motorcycle riding proficiency and the necessary aptitude for instructing students. No person shall be approved as an instructor unless the person has successfully completed the instructor training course or an equivalent course offered in another state.

The department shall establish by rule and regulation additional requirements for the approval of instructors.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 146, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-1501(a)(iv).

§ 31-5-1505.
Implementing authority; rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the motorcycle safety education program.

The department may enter into contracts with public or private entities for course delivery and for the provision of services or materials necessary for implementation of the program.

The department may offer motorcycle rider training courses directly and may approve courses offered by independent public or private entities as authorized program courses if they are administered and taught in full compliance with standards established for the state program.

The department may establish reasonable enrollment fees to be charged for persons who participate in motorcycle rider training courses. Any fees collected under this section by the department for courses provided directly by the department shall be deposited in the motorcycle safety education program account created by W.S.

31-5-1506

. Any fees collected by independent public or private entities approved by the department to offer courses shall be retained by the entity providing the course. Fees established under this section shall be set as low as possible to encourage participation in the courses, but shall be set so that the total of fees and other funds credited to the motorcycle safety education program account defray the expenses of the motorcycle safety education program.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 146, § 1.

§ 31-5-1506.
Motorcycle safety education program account.

The motorcycle safety education program account is created in the state highway fund and appropriated on a continual basis to the department which shall administer the account. Money in the account shall only be used for administration and implementation of the program, including defraying expenses in offering motorcycle rider training courses, either directly or by contract.

At the end of each fiscal year, monies remaining in the account shall be retained in the account. The interest and income earned on money in the account, after deducting any applicable charges, shall be credited to the account.

In addition to any fees collected under W.S.

31-5-1505

, the following revenue shall be credited to the account:

Seven dollars ($7.00) of the annual registration fee for each registered motorcycle as provided in W.S. 31-3-101(a)(ii)(D);

The fee for each motorcycle driver’s endorsement as provided in W.S. 31-7-113(a)(x), less the amount distributed under W.S. 31-7-113(g).

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 146, § 1; 2021 ch. 152, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added ", less the amount distributed under W.S. 31-7-113(g)" in (c)(ii).

§ 31-5-1507.
Advisory committee created; appointments; terms; duties; removal; compensation.

The director shall appoint a program advisory committee consisting of five (5) persons representing various interests in motorcycle safety to advise and assist the program coordinator in developing, establishing and maintaining the program. The committee shall monitor program implementation and report to the director as necessary with recommendations. The committee shall select from its membership a chairman and vice-chairman. The term of office for each member shall be two (2) years. Members may be removed as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. Vacancies shall be filled by the director for the unexpired term. Of the initial committee, three (3) members shall be appointed to serve for two (2) years and two (2) members shall serve for one (1) year. Members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed in the same manner and the same amount as state employees for their travel and per diem expenses while engaged in committee business.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 146, § 1.